Hawaii statutes.
[§171-174] Lease of Turtle Bay lands. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board of
land and natural resources may, without public auction, lease lands purchased
in fee simple pursuant to section 171-171, to the grantor of the conservation
easement or its successor in interest. The purpose of the lease shall be for the protection, preservation, and enhancement of natural
resources, while maintaining public access. The lease rental shall be
on a nominal basis, shall not exceed a term of sixty-five years, and be upon
such other terms and conditions as the board may determine. [L 2015, c 121, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next